Hawaii statutes.
§467B-6.5 Annual financial reports;
fiscal records and fees. (a) Every charitable organization required to
register pursuant to section 467B-2.1 shall annually file with the department a
report for its most recently completed fiscal year. If the charitable
organization files a Form 990 or 990-EZ with the Internal Revenue Service, the
annual report shall be a copy of that Form 990 or 990-EZ. If the registered
charitable organization is required to file a Form 990-T with the Internal
Revenue Service, the annual report shall include a copy of that Form 990-T. If
a charitable organization is not required to file a Form 990 or 990-EZ with the
Internal Revenue Service, the annual report shall contain all information
prescribed by the department. The charitable organization shall file its
annual report not later than the fifteenth day of the fifth month following the
close of its fiscal year. A charitable organization that has obtained an
extension of time to file a Form 990 or 990-EZ from the Internal Revenue
Service may obtain an extension of time to file the annual report with the
department, by filing with the department a copy of the Internal Revenue
Service's approved extension of time to file. The annual report shall be
accompanied by a filing fee as prescribed by subsection (d). The department
shall accept, under conditions prescribed by the attorney general, a copy or
duplicate original of financial statements, reports, or returns filed by the
charitable organization with the Internal Revenue Service or another state
having requirements similar to the provisions of this section; provided that
the attorney general may prescribe the form of the annual financial report for
charitable organizations that file the Form 990-N with the Internal Revenue Service,
or who are not required to file a Form 990 or 990-EZ with the Internal Revenue
Service.

(b) A charitable organization with gross
revenue in excess of $500,000 in the year covered by the report shall include
with its annual financial report, an audit report, prepared in accordance with
generally accepted accounting principles, by a certified public accountant;
provided that any charitable organization shall include with its annual
financial report an audit report, prepared in accordance with generally
accepted accounting principles, by a certified public accountant if required to
do so by a governmental authority or a third party. For the purpose of this
subsection, "gross revenue" does not include grants or fees from
government agencies or revenue derived from funds held in trust for the benefit
of the organization.

(c) The department, upon written request and
for good cause shown, may grant an extension of time, not to exceed three
months, for the filing of the annual report required by this section.

(d) Each charitable organization filing a
report required by this section shall pay a filing fee to the department based
on the total amount of its gross revenues during the time covered by the report
at the close of the calendar or fiscal year adopted by the charitable
organization as follows:

(1) $10, if less than $25,000;

(2) $25, if $25,000 but less than $50,000;

(3) $50, if $50,000 but less than $100,000;

(4) $100, if $100,000 but less than $250,000;

(5) $150, if $250,000 but less than $500,000;

(6) $200, if $500,000 but less than $1,000,000;

(7) $250, if $1,000,000 but less than $2,000,000;

(8) $350, if $2,000,000 but less than $5,000,000; or

(9) $600, if $5,000,000 or more.

(e) If a return, report, or filing fee
required under this section is not filed or paid, taking into account any
extension of time for filing, unless it is shown that the failure is due to
reasonable cause, a fine of $20 shall be imposed for each day during which the
violation continues; provided that the total amount imposed under this
subsection shall not exceed $1,000.

(f) Every charitable organization subject to
section 467B-2.1 and this section shall keep true fiscal records that shall be
available to the department for inspection upon request. The organization
shall retain the records for no less than three years after the end of the
fiscal year to which they relate.

(g) The attorney general may require the
annual financial report and audit report required by subsections (a) and (b) to
be electronically submitted and to include electronic signatures. [L 2008, c
174, pt of §2; am L 2011, c 40, §2; am L 2013, c 61, §6]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next